Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4503
Electronic recordation of statements and waiver of rights required; when.

(1) All statements relating to crimes described in subsection (2) of this section and statements regarding rights described in section 29-4501 or the waiver of such rights made during a custodial interrogation at a place of detention that are described in subsection (2) of this section shall be electronically recorded.

(2) Statements subject to subsection (1) of this section are those statements relating to:

(a) Crimes resulting in death or felonies involving (i) sexual assault, (ii) kidnapping, (iii) child abuse, or (iv) strangulation; or

(b) Offenses being investigated as part of the same course of conduct as the offenses described in subdivision (a) of this subsection.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 3.